Illinois, session 104th, HB4192.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The University of Illinois Act is amended by 5adding Section 7f-5 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 305/7f-5 new)7    Sec. 7f-5. Tuition waiver for armed service discharge. 8    (a) Each academic year the Board of Trustees shall offer a 9full-tuition waiver for undergraduate education at any campus 10under the Board's governance or supervision to any Illinois 11resident who: (i) was serving in the Illinois National Guard, 12the United States Army, the United States Marine Corps, the 13United States Navy, the United States Air Force, the United 14States Space Force, or a Reserve Officers' Training Corps 15program related to any of these armed service branches and was 16relying on full-tuition or partial-tuition assistance to 17complete the person's undergraduate education; (ii) has been 18discharged from service, either forcibly or by being given the 19choice of voluntary discharge or forced discharge, due to 20changes in federal policy leading to that person's discharge 21for reasons unrelated to performance; and (iii) has lost that 22tuition assistance prior to completion of the person's 23undergraduate education.  HB4192- 2 -LRB104 15153 LNS 28297 b1    To be eligible to receive a waiver under this Section, the 2individual must:3        (1) apply for the waiver in a form and manner as set 4    forth by the Board;5        (2) provide documentary proof of service, of prior 6    tuition assistance, and of discharge, whether voluntary or 7    involuntary; and8        (3) qualify for admission to the University under the 9    same admission requirements, standards, and policies that 10    the University applies to applicants for admission 11    generally to the University's respective undergraduate 12    colleges and programs.13    (b) Subject to subsection (a), an eligible applicant who 14has continued to maintain satisfactory academic progress 15toward graduation may have the individual's waiver renewed 16until the individual has expended 4 years of undergraduate 17full-tuition benefits under this Section.18    (c) The Board shall adopt rules as necessary to implement 19and administer this Section. 20    Section 10. The Southern Illinois University Management 21Act is amended by adding Section 8f-5 as follows: 22    (110 ILCS 520/8f-5 new)23    Sec. 8f-5. Tuition waiver for armed service discharge. 24    (a) Each academic year the Board shall offer a   HB4192- 3 -LRB104 15153 LNS 28297 b1full-tuition waiver for undergraduate education at any campus 2under the Board's governance or supervision to any Illinois 3resident who: (i) was serving in the Illinois National Guard, 4the United States Army, the United States Marine Corps, the 5United States Navy, the United States Air Force, the United 6States Space Force, or a Reserve Officers' Training Corps 7program related to any of these armed service branches and was 8relying on full-tuition or partial-tuition assistance to 9complete the person's undergraduate education; (ii) has been 10discharged from service, either forcibly or by being given the 11choice of voluntary discharge or forced discharge, due to 12changes in federal policy leading to that person's discharge 13for reasons unrelated to performance; and (iii) has lost that 14tuition assistance prior to completion of the person's 15undergraduate education.16    To be eligible to receive a waiver under this Section, the 17individual must:18        (1) apply for the waiver in a form and manner as set 19    forth by the Board;20        (2) provide documentary proof of service, of prior 21    tuition assistance, and of discharge, whether voluntary or 22    involuntary; and23        (3) qualify for admission to the University under the 24    same admission requirements, standards, and policies that 25    the University applies to applicants for admission 26    generally to the University's respective undergraduate   HB4192- 4 -LRB104 15153 LNS 28297 b1    colleges and programs.2    (b) Subject to subsection (a), an eligible applicant who 3has continued to maintain satisfactory academic progress 4toward graduation may have the individual's waiver renewed 5until the individual has expended 4 years of undergraduate 6full-tuition benefits under this Section.7    (c) The Board shall adopt rules as necessary to implement 8and administer this Section. 9    Section 15. The Chicago State University Law is amended by 10adding Section 5-92 as follows: 11    (110 ILCS 660/5-92 new)12    Sec. 5-92. Tuition waiver for armed service discharge. 13    (a) Each academic year the Board shall offer a 14full-tuition waiver for undergraduate education at any campus 15under the Board's governance or supervision to any Illinois 16resident who: (i) was serving in the Illinois National Guard, 17the United States Army, the United States Marine Corps, the 18United States Navy, the United States Air Force, the United 19States Space Force, or a Reserve Officers' Training Corps 20program related to any of these armed service branches and was 21relying on full-tuition or partial-tuition assistance to 22complete the person's undergraduate education; (ii) has been 23discharged from service, either forcibly or by being given the 24choice of voluntary discharge or forced discharge, due to   HB4192- 5 -LRB104 15153 LNS 28297 b1changes in federal policy leading to that person's discharge 2for reasons unrelated to performance; and (iii) has lost that 3tuition assistance prior to completion of the person's 4undergraduate education.5    To be eligible to receive a waiver under this Section, the 6individual must:7        (1) apply for the waiver in a form and manner as set 8    forth by the Board;9        (2) provide documentary proof of service, of prior 10    tuition assistance, and of discharge, whether voluntary or 11    involuntary; and12        (3) qualify for admission to the University under the 13    same admission requirements, standards, and policies that 14    the University applies to applicants for admission 15    generally to the University's respective undergraduate 16    colleges and programs.17    (b) Subject to subsection (a), an eligible applicant who 18has continued to maintain satisfactory academic progress 19toward graduation may have the individual's waiver renewed 20until the individual has expended 4 years of undergraduate 21full-tuition benefits under this Section.22    (c) The Board shall adopt rules as necessary to implement 23and administer this Section. 24    Section 20. The Eastern Illinois University Law is amended 25by adding Section 10-90.5 as follows:   HB4192- 6 -LRB104 15153 LNS 28297 b1    (110 ILCS 665/10-90.5 new)2    Sec. 10-90.5. Tuition waiver for armed service discharge. 3    (a) Each academic year the Board shall offer a 4full-tuition waiver for undergraduate education at any campus 5under the Board's governance or supervision to any Illinois 6resident who: (i) was serving in the Illinois National Guard, 7the United States Army, the United States Marine Corps, the 8United States Navy, the United States Air Force, the United 9States Space Force, or a Reserve Officers' Training Corps 10program related to any of these armed service branches and was 11relying on full-tuition or partial-tuition assistance to 12complete the person's undergraduate education; (ii) has been 13discharged from service, either forcibly or by being given the 14choice of voluntary discharge or forced discharge, due to 15changes in federal policy leading to that person's discharge 16for reasons unrelated to performance; and (iii) has lost that 17tuition assistance prior to completion of the person's 18undergraduate education.19    To be eligible to receive a waiver under this Section, the 20individual must:21        (1) apply for the waiver in a form and manner as set 22    forth by the Board;23        (2) provide documentary proof of service, of prior 24    tuition assistance, and of discharge, whether voluntary or 25    involuntary; and  HB4192- 7 -LRB104 15153 LNS 28297 b1        (3) qualify for admission to the University under the 2    same admission requirements, standards, and policies that 3    the University applies to applicants for admission 4    generally to the University's respective undergraduate 5    colleges and programs.6    (b) Subject to subsection (a), an eligible applicant who 7has continued to maintain satisfactory academic progress 8toward graduation may have the individual's waiver renewed 9until the individual has expended 4 years of undergraduate 10full-tuition benefits under this Section.11    (c) The Board shall adopt rules as necessary to implement 12and administer this Section. 13    Section 25. The Governors State University Law is amended 14by adding Section 15-92 as follows: 15    (110 ILCS 670/15-92 new)16    Sec. 15-92. Tuition waiver for armed service discharge. 17    (a) Each academic year the Board shall offer a 18full-tuition waiver for undergraduate education at any campus 19under the Board's governance or supervision to any Illinois 20resident who: (i) was serving in the Illinois National Guard, 21the United States Army, the United States Marine Corps, the 22United States Navy, the United States Air Force, the United 23States Space Force, or a Reserve Officers' Training Corps 24program related to any of these armed service branches and was   HB4192- 8 -LRB104 15153 LNS 28297 b1relying on full-tuition or partial-tuition assistance to 2complete the person's undergraduate education; (ii) has been 3discharged from service, either forcibly or by being given the 4choice of voluntary discharge or forced discharge, due to 5changes in federal policy leading to that person's discharge 6for reasons unrelated to performance; and (iii) has lost that 7tuition assistance prior to completion of the person's 8undergraduate education.9    To be eligible to receive a waiver under this Section, the 10individual must:11        (1) apply for the waiver in a form and manner as set 12    forth by the Board;13        (2) provide documentary proof of service, of prior 14    tuition assistance, and of discharge, whether voluntary or 15    involuntary; and16        (3) qualify for admission to the University under the 17    same admission requirements, standards, and policies that 18    the University applies to applicants for admission 19    generally to the University's respective undergraduate 20    colleges and programs.21    (b) Subject to subsection (a), an eligible applicant who 22has continued to maintain satisfactory academic progress 23toward graduation may have the individual's waiver renewed 24until the individual has expended 4 years of undergraduate 25full-tuition benefits under this Section.26    (c) The Board shall adopt rules as necessary to implement   HB4192- 9 -LRB104 15153 LNS 28297 b1and administer this Section. 2    Section 30. The Illinois State University Law is amended 3by adding Section 20-92 as follows: 4    (110 ILCS 675/20-92 new)5    Sec. 20-92. Tuition waiver for armed service discharge. 6    (a) Each academic year the Board shall offer a 7full-tuition waiver for undergraduate education at any campus 8under the Board's governance or supervision to any Illinois 9resident who: (i) was serving in the Illinois National Guard, 10the United States Army, the United States Marine Corps, the 11United States Navy, the United States Air Force, the United 12States Space Force, or a Reserve Officers' Training Corps 13program related to any of these armed service branches and was 14relying on full-tuition or partial-tuition assistance to 15complete the person's undergraduate education; (ii) has been 16discharged from service, either forcibly or by being given the 17choice of voluntary discharge or forced discharge, due to 18changes in federal policy leading to that person's discharge 19for reasons unrelated to performance; and (iii) has lost that 20tuition assistance prior to completion of the person's 21undergraduate education.22    To be eligible to receive a waiver under this Section, the 23individual must:24        (1) apply for the waiver in a form and manner as set   HB4192- 10 -LRB104 15153 LNS 28297 b1    forth by the Board;2        (2) provide documentary proof of service, of prior 3    tuition assistance, and of discharge, whether voluntary or 4    involuntary; and5        (3) qualify for admission to the University under the 6    same admission requirements, standards, and policies that 7    the University applies to applicants for admission 8    generally to the University's respective undergraduate 9    colleges and programs.10    (b) Subject to subsection (a), an eligible applicant who 11has continued to maintain satisfactory academic progress 12toward graduation may have the individual's waiver renewed 13until the individual has expended 4 years of undergraduate 14full-tuition benefits under this Section.15    (c) The Board shall adopt rules as necessary to implement 16and administer this Section. 17    Section 35. The Northeastern Illinois University Law is 18amended by adding Section 25-92 as follows: 19    (110 ILCS 680/25-92 new)20    Sec. 25-92. Tuition waiver for armed service discharge. 21    (a) Each academic year the Board shall offer a 22full-tuition waiver for undergraduate education at any campus 23under the Board's governance or supervision to any Illinois 24resident who: (i) was serving in the Illinois National Guard,   HB4192- 11 -LRB104 15153 LNS 28297 b1the United States Army, the United States Marine Corps, the 2United States Navy, the United States Air Force, the United 3States Space Force, or a Reserve Officers' Training Corps 4program related to any of these armed service branches and was 5relying on full-tuition or partial-tuition assistance to 6complete the person's undergraduate education; (ii) has been 7discharged from service, either forcibly or by being given the 8choice of voluntary discharge or forced discharge, due to 9changes in federal policy leading to that person's discharge 10for reasons unrelated to performance; and (iii) has lost that 11tuition assistance prior to completion of the person's 12undergraduate education.13    To be eligible to receive a waiver under this Section, the 14individual must:15        (1) apply for the waiver in a form and manner as set 16    forth by the Board;17        (2) provide documentary proof of service, of prior 18    tuition assistance, and of discharge, whether voluntary or 19    involuntary; and20        (3) qualify for admission to the University under the 21    same admission requirements, standards, and policies that 22    the University applies to applicants for admission 23    generally to the University's respective undergraduate 24    colleges and programs.25    (b) Subject to subsection (a), an eligible applicant who 26has continued to maintain satisfactory academic progress   HB4192- 12 -LRB104 15153 LNS 28297 b1toward graduation may have the individual's waiver renewed 2until the individual has expended 4 years of undergraduate 3full-tuition benefits under this Section.4    (c) The Board shall adopt rules as necessary to implement 5and administer this Section. 6    Section 40. The Northern Illinois University Law is 7amended by adding Section 30-92 as follows: 8    (110 ILCS 685/30-92 new)9    Sec. 30-92. Tuition waiver for armed service discharge. 10    (a) Each academic year the Board shall offer a 11full-tuition waiver for undergraduate education at any campus 12under the Board's governance or supervision to any Illinois 13resident who: (i) was serving in the Illinois National Guard, 14the United States Army, the United States Marine Corps, the 15United States Navy, the United States Air Force, the United 16States Space Force, or a Reserve Officers' Training Corps 17program related to any of these armed service branches and was 18relying on full-tuition or partial-tuition assistance to 19complete the person's undergraduate education; (ii) has been 20discharged from service, either forcibly or by being given the 21choice of voluntary discharge or forced discharge, due to 22changes in federal policy leading to that person's discharge 23for reasons unrelated to performance; and (iii) has lost that 24tuition assistance prior to completion of the person's   HB4192- 13 -LRB104 15153 LNS 28297 b1undergraduate education.2    To be eligible to receive a waiver under this Section, the 3individual must:4        (1) apply for the waiver in a form and manner as set 5    forth by the Board;6        (2) provide documentary proof of service, of prior 7    tuition assistance, and of discharge, whether voluntary or 8    involuntary; and9        (3) qualify for admission to the University under the 10    same admission requirements, standards, and policies that 11    the University applies to applicants for admission 12    generally to the University's respective undergraduate 13    colleges and programs.14    (b) Subject to subsection (a), an eligible applicant who 15has continued to maintain satisfactory academic progress 16toward graduation may have the individual's waiver renewed 17until the individual has expended 4 years of undergraduate 18full-tuition benefits under this Section.19    (c) The Board shall adopt rules as necessary to implement 20and administer this Section. 21    Section 45. The Western Illinois University Law is amended 22by adding Section 35-92 as follows: 23    (110 ILCS 690/35-92 new)24    Sec. 35-92. Tuition waiver for armed service discharge. HB4192- 14 -LRB104 15153 LNS 28297 b1    (a) Each academic year the Board shall offer a 2full-tuition waiver for undergraduate education at any campus 3under the Board's governance or supervision to any Illinois 4resident who: (i) was serving in the Illinois National Guard, 5the United States Army, the United States Marine Corps, the 6United States Navy, the United States Air Force, the United 7States Space Force, or a Reserve Officers' Training Corps 8program related to any of these armed service branches and was 9relying on full-tuition or partial-tuition assistance to 10complete the person's undergraduate education; (ii) has been 11discharged from service, either forcibly or by being given the 12choice of voluntary discharge or forced discharge, due to 13changes in federal policy leading to that person's discharge 14for reasons unrelated to performance; and (iii) has lost that 15tuition assistance prior to completion of the person's 16undergraduate education.17    To be eligible to receive a waiver under this Section, the 18individual must:19        (1) apply for the waiver in a form and manner as set 20    forth by the Board;21        (2) provide documentary proof of service, of prior 22    tuition assistance, and of discharge, whether voluntary or 23    involuntary; and24        (3) qualify for admission to the University under the 25    same admission requirements, standards, and policies that 26    the University applies to applicants for admission   HB4192- 15 -LRB104 15153 LNS 28297 b1    generally to the University's respective undergraduate 2    colleges and programs.3    (b) Subject to subsection (a), an eligible applicant who 4has continued to maintain satisfactory academic progress 5toward graduation may have the individual's waiver renewed 6until the individual has expended 4 years of undergraduate 7full-tuition benefits under this Section.8    (c) The Board shall adopt rules as necessary to implement 9and administer this Section.